Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE E. OTHER EXECUTIVE AGENCIES AND PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 470. ADVISORY COUNCIL ON CULTURAL AFFAIRS

Sec. 470.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Council" means the Advisory Council on Cultural Affairs.

(2) "State agency" includes an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.002. ESTABLISHMENT. The Advisory Council on Cultural Affairs is established in the office of the governor to advise the office on setting policy priorities that address and raise public awareness of major issues affecting this state due to the rapid growth of the state's Hispanic population and other issues resulting from changes in demographics in this state as determined by the governor.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.003. COMPOSITION; TERMS. (a) The council is composed of nine members appointed as follows:

(1) one ex officio member of the legislature appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(2) one ex officio member of the legislature appointed by the lieutenant governor; and

(3) seven members appointed by the governor.

(b) Members appointed by the speaker of the house and the lieutenant governor serve two-year terms. Members appointed by the governor serve four-year staggered terms, with either three or four members' terms expiring February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) In making appointments to the council, the appointing officials shall attempt to achieve representation of all areas of the state.

(d) The governor shall designate the chair and vice chair of the council from among the members of the council.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.004. MEETINGS. The council shall meet at least quarterly each fiscal year. The council may hold meetings by conference call.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.005. COMPENSATION. A member of the council is not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses incurred in performing council duties.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.006. DUTIES. The council shall study and make recommendations relating to the effect of the changing demographics of this state on the following areas, as they relate to this state:

(1) the economy;

(2) the workplace;

(3) educational attainment;

(4) health;

(5) veterans affairs; and

(6) political leadership.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.007. RECOMMENDATIONS. The council shall submit a report of the council's recommendations to the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives not later than October 1 of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.008. EXEMPTION. Chapter 2110 does not apply to the council.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 470.009. ASSISTANCE OF STATE AGENCIES. State agencies and political subdivisions of this state shall cooperate with the council to the greatest extent practicable to fully implement the council's statutory duties.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 947 (S.B. 459), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.